Utah statutes.
78B-12-401.   Advisory committee -- Membership -- Expiration.

(1)  On or before May 1, 2012, and then on or before May 1 of every fourth year subsequently, the governor shall appoint a child support guidelines advisory committee consisting of:

(a)  one representative recommended by the Office of Recovery Services;

(b)  one representative recommended by the Judicial Council;

(c)  two representatives recommended by the Utah State Bar Association;

(d)  two representatives of noncustodial parents;

(e)  two representatives of custodial parents;

(f)  one representative with expertise in economics; and

(g)  two representatives from diverse interests related to child support issues, as the governor may consider appropriate.  However, none of the individuals appointed under this subsection may be members of the Utah State Bar Association.

(2)  The term of the committee members expires one month after the report of the committee is submitted to the Legislature under Section 78B-12-402.

(3)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(4)  The committee ceases to exist no later than November 1, 2015, and then on or before November 1 of every fourth year subsequently.

